Texas, session 891, HB95.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter D, Chapter 171, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 171.0633 to read as follows: Sec. 171.0633.  RESTRICTION ON SALE OR DISTRIBUTION OF ABORTION-INDUCING DRUG THROUGH INTERNET WEBSITE. (a) A person may not sell or otherwise distribute through an Internet website an abortion-inducing drug for delivery by courier, mail service, or another delivery method to an address in this state unless the person obtains from the patient requesting the drug verification of a physician in this state prescribing the drug to the patient following an in-person medical examination. (b)  A violation of this section is a deceptive trade practice in addition to the practices described by Subchapter E, Chapter 17, Business & Commerce Code, and is actionable under that subchapter. SECTION 2.  Section 171.065(a), Health and Safety Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  A person who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly violates this subchapter, other than Section 171.0633, commits an offense.  An offense under this subsection is a state jail felony. SECTION 3.  Section 171.0633, Health and Safety Code, as added by this Act, applies only to the sale or distribution of an abortion-inducing drug that occurs on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.